Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1010
Board; employees.

The board of any such district in this state acting in its capacity as the governing body may employ such common and skilled labor, and professional and other services, as may be necessary to the proper performance of such work or improvement as is proposed to be done within any such district, and the maintenance thereof.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 10, p. 752.